test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-eehid_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - eehid: # 1B 
    eehid+N+Sg+Nom: eehid
    eehid+N+Sg+Gen: eehid
    eehid+N+Sg+Acc: eehid
    eehid+N+Sg+Ill: ehidân
    eehid+N+Sg+Loc: ehidist
    eehid+N+Sg+Com: ehidáin
    eehid+N+Sg+Abe: eehidttáá
    eehid+N+Ess:    ehidin
    eehid+N+Par:    ehidid
    eehid+N+Pl+Nom: ehideh
    eehid+N+Pl+Gen: ehidij
    eehid+N+Pl+Acc: ehidijd
    eehid+N+Pl+Ill: ehidáid
    eehid+N+Pl+Loc: ehidijn
    eehid+N+Pl+Com: ehidijguin
    eehid+N+Pl+Abe: ehidijttáá
